Maine, session 132, LD1982.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §1732, sub-§5-A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 277, §2, is amended
to read:
5-A. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances; PFAS. "Perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" means any member of the class of fluorinated
organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom. any chemical
substance or mixture containing a chemical substance that structurally contains at least one
of the following 3 substructures:
A. R-(CF )-CF(R')R", where both the CF and CF moieties are saturated carbons;
2
B. R-CF OCF -R', where R and R' can either be F, O or saturated carbons; or
2
C. CF C(CF )R'R", where R' and R" can either be F or saturated carbons.
3
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1614, sub-§1, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 477, §1 and
reallocated by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. A, §54, is amended to read:
F. "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" means substances that
include any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least
one fully fluorinated carbon atom. any chemical substance or mixture containing a
chemical substance that structurally contains at least one of the following 3
substructures:
(1) R-(CF )-CF(R')R", where both the CF and CF moieties are saturated carbons;
2
(2) R-CF OCF -R', where R and R' can either be F, O or saturated carbons; or
2
(3) CF C(CF )R'R", where R' and R" can either be F or saturated carbons.
3